Florida, session 2026, SB48.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 39 40 Section 1.âSection 83.471, Florida Statutes, is created to 41 read: 42 83.471âReusable tenant screening reports.â 43 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 44 (a)1.ââConsumer reportâ means any written, oral, or other 45 communication of information by a consumer reporting agency 46 bearing on a consumerâs credit worthiness, credit standing, 47 credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal 48 characteristics, or mode of living which is used or expected to 49 be used or collected in whole or in part for the purpose of 50 serving as a factor in establishing the consumerâs eligibility 51 for credit or insurance to be used primarily for personal, 52 family, or household purposes; employment purposes; or any other 53 purpose authorized under 15 U.S.C. s. 1681b. 54 2.âExcept for the restrictions provided in 15 U.S.C. s. 55 1681a(d)(3), the term âconsumer reportâ does not include: 56 a.âSubject to 15 U.S.C. s. 1681s-3, any report containing 57 information solely as to transactions or experiences between the 58 consumer and the person making the report; communication of such 59 information among persons related by common ownership or 60 affiliated by corporate control; or communication of other 61 information among persons related by common ownership or 62 affiliated by corporate control, if it is clearly and 63 conspicuously disclosed to the consumer that the information may 64 be communicated among such persons and the consumer is given the 65 opportunity, before the time that the information is initially 66 communicated, to direct that such information not be 67 communicated among such persons; 68 b.âAny authorization or approval of a specific extension of 69 credit directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit card or 70 similar device; 71 c.âAny report in which a person who has been requested by a 72 third party to make a specific extension of credit directly or 73 indirectly to a consumer conveys his or her decision with 74 respect to such request if the third party advises the consumer 75 of the name and address of the person to whom the request was 76 made, and such person makes the disclosures to the consumer 77 required under 15 U.S.C. s. 1681m; or 78 d.âA communication described in 15 U.S.C. s. 1681a(o) or 15 79 U.S.C. s. 1681a(x). 80 (b)ââConsumer reporting agencyâ means any person who, for 81 monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, 82 regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of 83 assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other 84 information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer 85 reports to third parties, and who uses any means or facility of 86 interstate commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing 87 consumer reports. 88 (c)ââReusable tenant screening reportâ means a report that: 89 1.âIncludes all of the following: 90 a.âThe applicantâs full name. 91 b.âThe applicantâs contact information, including mailing 92 address, e-mail address, and telephone number. 93 c.âVerification of the applicantâs employment. 94 d.âThe applicantâs last known address. 95 e.âThe results of an eviction history check in a manner and 96 for a period of time consistent with applicable law related to 97 the consideration of eviction history in housing. 98 f.âThe date through which the information contained in the 99 report is current. 100 g.âThe applicantâs consumer report. 101 2.a.âIs prepared within the previous 30 days by a consumer 102 reporting agency at the request and expense of an applicant. 103 b.âIs made directly available to a landlord for use in the 104 rental application process or is provided through a third-party 105 website that regularly engages in the business of providing a 106 reusable tenant screening report and complies with all state and 107 federal laws pertaining to use and disclosure of information 108 contained in a consumer report by a consumer reporting agency. 109 c.âIs available to the landlord at no cost to access or 110 use. 111 (2)âA landlord may accept reusable tenant screening reports 112 and may require an applicant to state that there has not been a 113 material change to the information in the reusable tenant 114 screening report. 115 (3)âIf an applicant provides a reusable tenant screening 116 report to a landlord who accepts such reports, the landlord may 117 not charge the applicant a fee to access the report or an 118 application screening fee. 119 (4)âThis section does not: 120 (a)âAffect any other applicable law related to the 121 consideration of criminal history information in housing, 122 including, but not limited to, local ordinances governing the 123 information that landlords may review and consider when 124 determining to whom they will rent; or 125 (b)âRequire a landlord to accept reusable tenant screening 126 reports. 127 Section 2.âSubsections (3), (4), and (5) of section 128 163.31771, Florida Statutes, are amended, paragraph (h) is added 129 to subsection (2) of that section, and a new subsection (5) is 130 added to that section, to read: 131 163.31771âAccessory dwelling units.â 132 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 133 (h)ââPrimary dwelling unitâ means the existing or proposed 134 single-family dwelling on the property where a proposed 135 accessory dwelling unit would be located. 136 (3)âBy December 1, 2026, a local government shall may adopt 137 an ordinance to allow accessory dwelling units in any area zoned 138 for single-family residential use. Such ordinance must apply 139 prospectively to accessory dwelling units approved after the 140 date the ordinance is adopted. Such ordinance may regulate the 141 permitting, construction, and use of an accessory dwelling unit 142 but may not do any of the following: 143 (a)âProhibit the renting or leasing of an accessory 144 dwelling unit, except to prohibit the renting or leasing of an 145 accessory dwelling unit approved after the effective date of the 146 ordinance for a term of less than 1 month, notwithstanding s. 147 509.032(7)(b). 148 (b)âRequire that the owner of a parcel on which an 149 accessory dwelling unit is constructed reside in the primary 150 dwelling unit. 151 (c)âIncrease parking requirements on any parcel that can 152 accommodate an additional motor vehicle on a driveway without 153 impeding access to the primary dwelling unit. 154 (d)âRequire replacement parking if a garage, carport, or 155 covered parking structure is converted to create an accessory 156 dwelling unit. 157 (4)âAn application for a building permit to construct an 158 accessory dwelling unit must include an affidavit from the 159 applicant which attests that the unit will be rented at an 160 affordable rate to an extremely-low-income, very-low-income, 161 low-income, or moderate-income person or persons. 162 (5)âEach accessory dwelling unit allowed by an ordinance 163 adopted under this section which provides affordable rental 164 housing shall apply toward satisfying the affordable housing 165 component of the housing element in the local governmentâs 166 comprehensive plan under s. 163.3177(6)(f). 167 (5)âThe owner of a property with an accessory dwelling unit 168 may not be denied a homestead exemption for those portions of 169 property on which the owner maintains a permanent residence 170 solely on the basis of the property containing an accessory 171 dwelling unit that is or may be rented to another person. 172 However, if the accessory dwelling unit is rented to another 173 person, the accessory dwelling unit must be assessed separately 174 from the homestead property and taxed according to its use. 175 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 420.615, Florida 176 Statutes, is amended to read: 177 420.615âAffordable housing land donation density bonus 178 incentives.â 179 (1)âA local government may provide density bonus incentives 180 pursuant to the provisions of this section to any landowner who 181 voluntarily donates fee simple interest in real property to the 182 local government for the purpose of assisting the local 183 government in providing affordable housing, including housing 184 that is affordable for military families receiving the basic 185 allowance for housing. Donated real property must be determined 186 by the local government to be appropriate for use as affordable 187 housing and must be subject to deed restrictions to ensure that 188 the property will be used for affordable housing. 189 Section 4.âThe Office of Program Policy Analysis and 190 Government Accountability (OPPAGA) shall evaluate the efficacy 191 of using mezzanine finance, or second-position short-term debt, 192 to stimulate the construction of owner-occupied housing that is 193 affordable as defined in s. 420.0004(3), Florida Statutes, in 194 this state. OPPAGA shall also evaluate the potential of tiny 195 homes in meeting the need for affordable housing in this state. 196 OPPAGA shall consult with the Florida Housing Finance 197 Corporation and the Shimberg Center for Housing Studies at the 198 University of Florida in conducting its evaluation. By December 199 31, 2027, OPPAGA shall submit a report of its findings to the 200 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 201 Representatives. Such report must include recommendations for 202 the structuring of a model mezzanine finance program. 203 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.